Illinois, session 104th, HB1286.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 367f as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/367f)  (from Ch. 73, par. 979f)7    Sec. 367f. Firefighters' continuance privilege. As used in 8this Section:9    1. The The terms "municipality", "deferred pensioner" and 10"creditable service" shall have the meaning ascribed to such 11terms by Sections 4-103, 4-105a and 4-108, respectively, of 12the Illinois Pension Code, as now or hereafter amended.13    2. "Firefighter" means a person who is a "firefighter" as 14defined in Section 4-106 of the Illinois Pension Code, a 15paramedic who is employed by a unit of local government, or an 16emergency medical technician, emergency medical 17technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, 18or advanced emergency medical technician who is employed by a 19unit of local government.20    3. The "retirement or disability period" of a firefighter 21means the period:22        a. which begins on the day the firefighter is removed 23    from a municipality's fire department payroll because of   HB1286- 2 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1    the occurrence of any of the following events, to wit: (i) 2    the firefighter retires as a deferred pensioner under 3    Section 4-105a of the Illinois Pension Code, (ii) the 4    firefighter retires from active service as a firefighter 5    with an attained age and accumulated creditable service 6    which together qualify the firefighter for immediate 7    receipt of retirement pension benefits under Section 4-109 8    of the Illinois Pension Code, or (iii) the firefighter's 9    disability is established under Section 4-112 of the 10    Illinois Pension Code; and11        b. which ends on the first to occur of any of the 12    following events, to wit: (i) the firefighter's 13    reinstatement or reentry into active service on the 14    municipality's fire department as provided for under 15    Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, (ii) the 16    firefighter's exercise of any refund option available 17    under Section 4-116 of the Illinois Pension Code, (iii) 18    the firefighter's loss pursuant to Section 4-138 of the 19    Illinois Pension Code of any benefits provided for in 20    Article 4 of that Code, or (iv) the firefighter's death or -21    - if at the time of the firefighter's death the 22    firefighter is survived by a spouse who, in that capacity, 23    is entitled to receive a surviving spouse's monthly 24    pension pursuant to Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code -25    - then the death or remarriage of that spouse.26    No policy of group accident and health insurance under   HB1286- 3 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1which firefighters employed by a municipality are insured for 2their individual benefit shall be issued or delivered in this 3State to any municipality unless such group policy provides 4for the election of continued group insurance coverage for the 5retirement or disability period of each firefighter who is 6insured under the provisions of the group policy on the day 7immediately preceding the day on which the retirement or 8disability period of such firefighter begins. So long as any 9required premiums for continued group insurance coverage are 10paid in accordance with the provisions of the group policy, an 11election made pursuant to this Section shall provide continued 12group insurance coverage for a firefighter throughout the 13retirement or disability period of the firefighter and, unless 14the firefighter otherwise elects and subject to any other 15provisions of the group policy which relate either to the 16provision or to the termination of dependents' coverage and 17which are not inconsistent with this Section, for any 18dependents of the firefighter who are insured under the group 19policy on the day immediately preceding the day on which the 20retirement or disability period of the firefighter begins; 21provided, however, that when such continued group insurance 22coverage is in effect with respect to a firefighter on the date 23of the firefighter's death but the retirement or disability 24period of the firefighter does not end with such firefighter's 25death, then the deceased firefighter's surviving spouse upon 26whose death or remarriage such retirement or disability period   HB1286- 4 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1will end shall be entitled, without further election and upon 2payment of any required premiums in accordance with the 3provisions of the group policy, to maintain such continued 4group insurance coverage in effect until the end of such 5retirement or disability period. Continued group insurance 6coverage shall be provided in accordance with this Section at 7the same premium rate from time to time charged for equivalent 8coverage provided under the group policy with respect to 9covered firefighters whose retirement or disability period has 10not begun, and no distinction or discrimination in the amount 11or rate of premiums or in any waiver of premium or other 12benefit provision shall be made between continued group 13insurance coverage elected pursuant to this Section and 14equivalent coverage provided to firefighters under the group 15policy other than pursuant to the provisions of this Section; 16provided that no municipality shall be required by reason of 17any provision of this Section to pay any group insurance 18premium other than one that may be negotiated in a collective 19bargaining agreement. If a person electing continued coverage 20under this Section becomes eligible for medicare coverage, 21benefits under the group policy may continue as a supplement 22to the medicare coverage upon payment of any required premiums 23to maintain the benefits of the group policy as supplemental 24coverage.25    Within 15 days of the beginning of the retirement or 26disability period of any firefighter entitled to elect   HB1286- 5 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1continued group insurance coverage under any group policy 2affected by this Section, the municipality last employing such 3firefighter shall give written notice of such beginning by 4certified mail, return receipt requested to the insurance 5company issuing such policy. The notice shall include the 6firefighter's name and last known place of residence and the 7beginning date of the firefighter's retirement or disability 8period.9    Within 15 days of the date of receipt of such notice from 10the municipality, the insurance company by certified mail, 11return receipt requested, shall give written notice to the 12firefighter at the firefighter's last known place of residence 13that coverage under the group policy may be continued for the 14retirement or disability period of the firefighter as provided 15in this Section. Such notice shall set forth: (i) a statement 16of election to be filed by the firefighter if the firefighter 17wishes to continue such group insurance coverage, (ii) the 18amount of monthly premium, including a statement of the 19portion of such monthly premium attributable to any 20dependents' coverage which the firefighter may elect, and 21(iii) instructions as to the return of the election form to the 22insurance company issuing such policy. Election shall be made, 23if at all, by returning the statement of election to the 24insurance company by certified mail, return receipt requested 25within 15 days after having received it.26    If the firefighter elects to continue coverage, it shall   HB1286- 6 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1be the obligation of the firefighter to pay the monthly 2premium directly to the municipality which shall forward it to 3the insurance company issuing the group insurance policy, or 4as otherwise directed by the insurance company; provided, 5however, that the firefighter shall be entitled to designate 6on the statement of election required to be filed with the 7insurance company that the total monthly premium, or such 8portion thereof as is not contributed by a municipality, be 9deducted by a Firefighter's Pension Fund from any monthly 10pension payment otherwise payable to or on behalf of the 11firefighter pursuant to Article 4 of the Illinois Pension 12Code, and be remitted by such Pension Fund to the insurance 13company. The portion, if any, of the monthly premium 14contributed by a municipality for such continued group 15insurance coverage shall be paid by the municipality directly 16to the insurance company issuing the group insurance policy, 17or as otherwise directed by the insurance company. Such 18continued group insurance coverage shall relate back to the 19beginning of the firefighter's retirement or disability 20period.21    The amendment, renewal or extension of any group insurance 22policy affected by this Section shall be deemed to be the 23issuance of a new policy of insurance for purposes of this 24Section.25    In the event that a municipality makes a program of 26accident, health, hospital or medical benefits available to   HB1286- 7 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1its firefighters through self-insurance, or by participation 2in a pool or reciprocal insurer, or by contract in a form other 3than a policy of group insurance with one or more medical 4service plans, health care service corporations, health 5maintenance organizations, or any other professional 6corporations or plans under which health care or reimbursement 7for the costs thereof is provided, whether the cost of such 8benefits is borne by the municipality or the firefighters or 9both, such firefighters and their surviving spouses shall have 10the same right to elect continued coverage under such program 11of benefits as they would have if such benefits were provided 12by a policy of group accident and health insurance. In such 13cases, the notice of right to elect continued coverage shall 14be sent by the municipality; the statement of election shall 15be sent to the municipality; and references to the required 16premium shall refer to that portion of the cost of such 17benefits which is not borne by the municipality, either 18voluntarily or pursuant to the provisions of a collective 19bargaining agreement. In the case of a municipality providing 20such benefits through self-insurance or participation in a 21pool or reciprocal insurer, the right to elect continued 22coverage which is provided by this paragraph shall be 23implemented and made available to the firefighters of the 24municipality and qualifying surviving spouses not later than 25July 1, 1985.26    The amendment, renewal or extension of any such contract   HB1286- 8 -LRB104 07420 BAB 17461 b1in a form other than a policy of group insurance policy shall 2be deemed the formation of a new contract for the purposes of 3this Section.4    This Section shall not limit the exercise of any 5conversion privileges available under Section 367e.6    Pursuant to paragraphs (h) and (i) of Section 6 of Article 7VII of the Illinois Constitution, this Section specifically 8denies and limits the exercise by a home rule unit of any power 9which is inconsistent with this Section and all existing laws 10and ordinances which are inconsistent with this Section are 11hereby superseded. This Section does not preempt the 12concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers consistent 13herewith.14    The Division of Insurance of the Department of Financial 15and Professional Regulation shall enforce the provisions of 16this Section, including provisions relating to municipality 17self-insured benefit plans. 18(Source: P.A. 103-52, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-18-24.)